New York, session 2025-2026, A10666.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Title 5 of article 10-C of the public authorities law is 2 REPEALED. 3 § 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 4 existing records, property, rights, titles, and interest of the Clif- 5 ton-Fine health care corporation shall vest in and be possessed by the 6 Clifton-Fine health care corporation d/b/a Clifton-Fine hospital, a New 7 York not-for-profit corporation and its successors or assigns. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14902-03-6